test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_vuonjas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - vuonjâš: # Checked with Matti Morottaja & Pekka Sammallahti; double čč should be the 1st form; č at least accepted, also recommended, if possible 
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Nom: vuonjâš
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Gen: vuonnjâš
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Acc: vuonnjâš
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Ill: [vuonjâččân, vuonjâčân]
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Loc: [vuonjâččist, vuonjâčist]
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Com: [vuonjâččáin, vuonjâčáin]
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Abe: vuonnjâšttáá
    vuonjâš+N+Ess: vuonjâččin
    vuonjâš+N+Par: vuonjâččid
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Nom: [vuonjâččeh, vuonjâčeh]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Gen: [vuonjâččij, vuonjâčij]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Acc: [vuonjâččijd, vuonjâčijd]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Ill: [vuonjâččáid, vuonjâčáid]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Loc: [vuonjâččijn, vuonjâčijn]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Com: [vuonjâččijguin, vuonjâčijguin, vuonjâččijgijn, vuonjâčijgijn]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Abe: [vuonjâččijttáá, vuonjâčijttáá]

  Noun - kierâš: # MLO, ok 
    kierâš+N+Sg+Nom: kierâš
    kierâš+N+Sg+Gen: kierrâš
    kierâš+N+Sg+Acc: kierrâš
    kierâš+N+Sg+Ill: [kierâččân, kierâčân]
    kierâš+N+Sg+Loc: [kierâččist, kierâčist]
    kierâš+N+Sg+Com: [kierâččáin, kierâčáin]
    kierâš+N+Sg+Abe: kierrâšttáá
    kierâš+N+Ess: kierâččin
    kierâš+N+Par: kierâččid
    kierâš+N+Pl+Nom: [kierâččeh, kierâčeh]
    kierâš+N+Pl+Gen: [kierâččij, kierâčij]
    kierâš+N+Pl+Acc: [kierâččijd, kierâčijd]
    kierâš+N+Pl+Ill: [kierâččáid, kierâčáid]
    kierâš+N+Pl+Loc: [kierâččijn, kierâčijn]
    kierâš+N+Pl+Com: [kierâččijguin, kierâčijguin, kierâččijgijn, kierâčijgijn]
    kierâš+N+Pl+Abe: [kierâččijttáá, kierâčijttáá]

  Noun - vuorâš: # MLO, ok 
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Nom: vuorâš
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Gen: vuorrâš
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Acc: vuorrâš
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Ill: [vuorâččân, vuorâčân]
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Loc: [vuorâččist, vuorâčist]
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Com: [vuorâččáin, vuorâčáin]
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Abe: vuorrâšttáá
    vuorâš+N+Ess: vuorâččin
    vuorâš+N+Par: vuorâččid
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Nom: [vuorâččeh, vuorâčeh]
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Gen: [vuorâččij, vuorâčij]
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Acc: [vuorâččijd, vuorâčijd]
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Ill: [vuorâččáid, vuorâčáid]
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Loc: [vuorâččijn, vuorâčijn]
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Com: [vuorâččijguin, vuorâčijguin, vuorâččijgijn, vuorâčijgijn]
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Abe: [vuorâččijttáá, vuorâčijttáá]
